Utah statutes.
58-9-609.   Cremation containers.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a funeral service establishment may not make or enforce a rule requiring that human remains be:

(i)  placed in a casket before cremation; or

(ii)  cremated in a casket.

(b)  A funeral service establishment may not refuse to accept human remains for cremation because they are not in a casket.

(2) (a)  Human remains must be delivered to a crematory in a casket or cremation container.

(b)  Human remains may not be removed from a casket or cremation container once delivered to the crematory, and the casket or cremation container shall be cremated with the human remains, unless:

(i)  the funeral service establishment has been provided with written instructions to the contrary by the authorizing agent; or

(ii)  the funeral service establishment does not accept metal caskets for cremation.



Enacted by Chapter 353, 2008 General Session

